Utah statutes.
73-26-401.   Powers of division.
The division may:
(1)  enter into contracts and agreements for the development, operation,
maintenance, repair, and replacement of projects authorized under this
chapter; and
(2) (a)  set prices for the sale or lease of water made available by the
project, in accordance with Section 73-26-506 and rules made by the board; and
(b)  enter into contracts for the sale or lease of the water.
